Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202632-945
Request for ballot; provide registration form; when; change registration; acknowledgment.

(1) When a request for a ballot from a person who is not registered to vote in the county reaches the election commissioner or county clerk by mail, by facsimile transmission, or by means other than by application in person on or prior to the third Friday preceding the election, the election commissioner or county clerk shall mail to the applicant the registration application with the ballot. No ballot shall be sent by mail to any person after the third Friday preceding the election if such person is not a registered voter.

(2) When an application for a ballot from a person who is registered in the county reaches the county clerk or election commissioner by mail, facsimile transmission, or other means than by application in person and the application indicates that the applicant has changed his or her residence within the county, the county clerk or election commissioner shall change the address on the applicant's voter registration and mail to such applicant an acknowledgment of change of registration and the ballot as provided by section 32-947.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 288;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 95;

Laws 2005, LB 98, § 17;

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 46;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 21.
July 18, 2026